Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4097.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Pursuant to ORS 196.566, the Oregon Ocean Science Trust may create and
maintain an entity that is exempt from federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code, as amended, for the purpose of advancing the mission of the trust.
Passed by House February 10, 2026 Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Approved:
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Passed by Senate February 25, 2026
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
.................................................................................. ........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4097 (HB 4097-INTRO) Page 1